California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(2) The nonfederal share of additional or augmented incentive payments pursuant to this subdivision may consist of voluntary intergovernmental transfers of funds provided by eligible governmental agencies or other public entities, pursuant to Section 14164. Upon providing any intergovernmental
 transfer of funds, a transferring entity shall certify that the transferred funds qualify for federal financial participation pursuant to Section 433.51 of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations and any other applicable Medicaid laws, and in the form and manner specified by the department. An intergovernmental transfer of funds made pursuant to this subdivision shall be considered voluntary for purposes of all state and federal laws. Notwithstanding any other law, the department shall not assess the fee described in subdivision (d) of Section 14301.4 or any other similar fee on the intergovernmental transfers made pursuant to this subdivision.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 143, Sec. 402.   (AB 133)   Effective July 27, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

14184.208.

(a) To promote more integrated care for dual eligible beneficiaries, the department shall seek to align the enrollment of dual eligible beneficiaries in affiliated Medi-Cal managed care plans and Medicare plans, including Medicare Advantage Dual Special Needs Plans (D-SNP), as described in this section and in accordance with the CalAIM Terms and Conditions. A dual eligible beneficiary shall not be required to enroll in a D-SNP for purposes of receiving their Medi-Cal benefits.

(b) (1) Commencing January 1, 2023, subject to subdivision (f) of Section 14184.102, the department shall require each Medi-Cal managed care plan operating in
 Coordinated Care Initiative counties to operate, or continue to operate, a D-SNP in
 accordance with the CalAIM Terms and Conditions, and in accordance with federal requirements for each D-SNP, to have an executed contract with the department, referred to as a State Medicaid Agency Contract (SMAC). The requirements described in this paragraph shall not be applicable to a subcontracted delegate health plan.

(2) In Coordinated Care Initiative counties, beginning in contract year 2023, the department may only contract with a proposed D-SNP that is affiliated with a Medi-Cal managed care plan or a subcontracted delegate health plan, or was contracted with the department for a D-SNP in contract year 2022 in the proposed D-SNP service area.

(3) In Coordinated Care Initiative counties, beginning with contract year 2023, dual eligible
 beneficiaries that are not already enrolled in a D-SNP for contract year 2022 may only enroll in a D-SNP that is affiliated with a Medi-Cal managed care plan or a subcontracted delegate health plan in the beneficiary’s service area.

(4) In Coordinated Care Initiative counties, beginning with contract year 2023, a dual eligible beneficiary shall be assigned to a Medi-Cal managed care plan, or subcontracted delegate health plan, that is affiliated with the Medicare Advantage plan, including a D-SNP, in which the dual eligible beneficiary is enrolled. The department may approve exceptions to this policy, to support beneficiary enrollment choice.

(c) (1) Commencing January 1, 2026, subject to subdivision (f) of Section 14184.102 and paragraph (5) of this subdivision,
 the
 department may require each Medi-Cal managed care plan to operate, or continue to operate, a D-SNP in accordance with the CalAIM Terms and Conditions, and in accordance with federal requirements for each D-SNP to have an executed contract with the department, referred to as an SMAC. The requirements described in this paragraph shall not be applicable to a subcontracted delegate health plan.

(2) In non-Coordinated Care Initiative counties, beginning no later than contract year 2025, the department shall only contract with a proposed D-SNP that is affiliated with a Medi-Cal managed care plan or subcontracted delegate health plan, or was contracted with the department for a D-SNP in the proposed D-SNP service area in the contract year that immediately precedes the contract year in which this paragraph is implemented with
 respect to an individual county.

(3) In non-Coordinated Care Initiative counties, beginning no later than contract year 2026, a dual eligible beneficiary shall be assigned to a Medi-Cal managed care plan or a subcontracted delegate health plan that is affiliated with the Medicare Advantage
 plan, including a D-SNP, in which the dual eligible beneficiary is enrolled. The department may approve exceptions to the requirement described in this subparagraph when it determines necessary to support beneficiary enrollment choice.

(4) In non-Coordinated Care Initiative counties, beginning no later than contract year 2025, dual eligible beneficiaries not already enrolled in a D-SNP, in the contract year that immediately precedes the contract year in which this paragraph is implemented with respect to an individual county, may only enroll in a D-SNP that is affiliated with a Medi-Cal managed care plan, or a subcontracted delegate health plan, in the beneficiary’s service area. Beginning no later than contract year 2025, D-SNPs that are not affiliated with a Medi-Cal managed care plan or a subcontracted delegate health
 plan shall not accept new enrollment of dual eligible beneficiaries.

(5) The department shall conduct a feasibility study of D-SNPs, in specific non-Coordinated Care Initiative counties as determined by the department, to be completed no later than July 1, 2022. As a result of the study findings, or evidence provided by a Medi-Cal managed care plan of the potential for significant financial losses that may be incurred by a Medi-Cal managed care plan as a result of operating a D-SNP, and evidence provided by a Medi-Cal managed care plan that the plan has made a good faith effort but is not able to develop a partnership with a D-SNP for coordinated care across Medicare and Medi-Cal, the department may provide, in its sole discretion, an exemption from the requirements in paragraph (1) of this subdivision on an individual plan basis for a
 period of three years. The department may renew this exemption for successive three-year periods based on study findings or evidence of potential losses, and evidence of a good faith effort, as specified in this paragraph.

(d) To ensure dual eligible beneficiaries are fully informed regarding aligned enrollment, the department or the Med-Cal managed care plan, as applicable, shall provide informing notices to affected beneficiaries regarding Medi-Cal plan enrollment changes related to aligned enrollment. The notices shall be developed in consultation with consumer advocates.

(e) Beginning in contract year 2023, the department shall include requirements for network adequacy, aligned networks, and continuity of care in the SMAC. The requirements shall be developed
 in consultation with affected stakeholders.

(f) The department shall contract with public or private entities in assisting dual eligible beneficiaries in understanding their health care coverage options, overcoming access to care barriers, and addressing eligibility and enrollment barriers.

(g) The department shall convene a workgroup including plans, providers, and consumer stakeholders to discuss transition to a statewide Managed Long-Term Services and Supports and D-SNP structure.

(h) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Coordinated Care Initiative counties” means the Counties of Los Angeles, Orange, Riverside, San Bernardino, San
 Diego, San Mateo, and Santa Clara.

(2) “Dual eligible beneficiary” means an individual 21 years of age or older who is enrolled for benefits under Medicare Part A (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1395c et seq.) or Medicare Part B (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1395j et seq.), or both, and is eligible for medical assistance under the Medi-Cal State Plan. For purposes of this section, “dual eligible beneficiary” shall include both “full-benefit dual eligible beneficiaries” and “partial-benefit dual eligible beneficiaries,” as those terms are defined in this subdivision.

(3) “Full-benefit dual eligible beneficiary” means an individual 21 years of age or older who is enrolled for benefits under Medicare Part A (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1395c et seq.), Medicare Part B (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1395j et seq.), and Medicare Part D (42
 U.S.C. Sec.
 1395w-101), and is eligible for medical assistance under the Medi-Cal State Plan.

(4) “Medicare Advantage Dual Special Needs Plan” or “D-SNP” shall have the same meaning as set forth in Section 1395w-28(b)(6) of Title 42 of the United States Code.

(5) “Partial-benefit dual eligible beneficiary” means an individual 21 years of age or older who is enrolled for benefits under Medicare Part A (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1395c et seq.), but not Medicare Part B (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1395j et seq.), or who is enrolled for Medicare Part B (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1395j et seq.), but not Medicare Part A (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1395c et seq.), and is eligible medical assistance under the Medi-Cal State Plan.

(6) “Subcontracted delegate health
 plan” means a health care service plan that is a subcontractor of a Medi-Cal managed care plan that the department determines to have assumed the entire financial risk for all Medi-Cal services provided to a dual eligible beneficiary that are covered under the applicable comprehensive risk contract of the Medi-Cal managed care plan.

(7) “Subcontractor” shall have the same meaning as set forth in Section 438.2 of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(i) For purposes of this section, “Medi-Cal managed care plan” shall not include a managed care plan contract with the AIDS Healthcare Foundation.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 143, Sec. 402.   (AB 133)   Effective July 27, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

14184.300.

(a) (1) To the extent federal financial participation is available, the department shall continue to implement the Global Payment Program (GPP) as described in Section 14184.40 during the CalAIM term. The department shall continue to administer the GPP in accordance with Section 14184.40, except to the extent changes are approved in the CalAIM Terms and Conditions and except as provided in subdivision (b).

(b) (1) Commencing January 1, 2021, the GPP program year shall be aligned with the calendar year. The department shall provide to the GPP systems a revised schedule for the reporting, notification, intergovernmental transfer,
 and payment set forth in paragraphs (3) and (4) of subdivision (d) of Section 14184.40, which shall maintain the same conditions and timeline, adjusted by six months to align with the calendar year, and consistent with the CalAIM Terms and Conditions.

(2) Commencing January 1, 2021, the GPP system-specific IGT factors identified in paragraph (3) of subdivision (g) of Section 14184.40 shall be inapplicable and the initial transfer amount calculated for each GPP system shall be identified by the department and communicated in writing to each GPP system for each applicable GPP program year.

(3) Commencing January 1, 2021, for purposes of determining the applicable GPP’s aggregate annual limit, applicable portions of the federal disproportionate share allotment for the federal
 fiscal year that ends in the GPP program year, and for the federal fiscal year that commences in the applicable GPP program year, shall be appropriately aligned with the GPP program year.

(4) Subject to subdivision (f) of Section 14184.102, a hospital that is operated by the University of California, and its affiliated and contracted providers, may elect to participate as a GPP system during the CalAIM terms by providing written notice to the department no later than June 1 of the calendar year immediately preceding the subject GPP program year.

(A) A University of California hospital that is approved to participate as a GPP system shall continue to participate as a GPP system for all remaining GPP program years during the CalAIM term, and shall be subject to all other
 provisions, requirements, and restrictions applicable to GPP systems in accordance with the CalAIM Terms and Conditions.

(B) A University of California hospital that is approved to participate as a GPP system shall be ineligible to receive disproportionate share hospital payments through the termination of GPP.

(C) If a University of California hospital is approved to participate as a GPP system, the department shall make all appropriate funding and program adjustments necessary to account for the additional participating GPP system in the subject GPP program years, including, but not limited to, the determinations of the federal disproportionate share hospital allotment funding available to nonparticipating University of California hospitals and the resulting GPP
 aggregate annual limits.

(5) Subject to the availability of sufficient nonfederal share funds for this purpose, the department may seek federal approval for, and implement, additional funding and program components for GPP systems that support and further the objectives of CalAIM and GPP.

(c) Before implementing any of the modifications described in subdivision (b), the department shall consult with the GPP systems.

(d) Except as otherwise provided in the CalAIM Terms and Conditions or in this section, and without limiting the authority in subdivision (g) of Section 14184.102, the rights, obligations, and limitations set forth in Section 14184.40 shall apply to the GPP as continued pursuant to this
 section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 143, Sec. 402.   (AB 133)   Effective July 27, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

14184.301.

The payment methodologies and requirements described in Section 14184.30, as amended by the act that added this section, shall continue to apply during the entirety of the CalAIM term and any extension periods in which the Global Payment Program pursuant to Section 14184.300 is authorized.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 143, Sec. 402.   (AB 133)   Effective July 27, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

14184.400.

(a) Commencing January 1, 2022, subject to subdivision (f) of Section 14184.102, the department shall continue to implement the Specialty Mental Health Services Program described in part in Chapter 8.9 (commencing with Section 14700), as a component of CalAIM and in accordance with this article and the CalAIM Terms and Conditions.

(b) Each mental health plan contracting with the department to provide specialty mental health services pursuant to Chapter 8.9 (commencing with Section 14700) shall comply with all applicable CalAIM Terms and Conditions and any guidance issued by the department pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 14184.102.

(c) (1) As a component of the Specialty
 Mental Health Services Program described in this section, the department, in consultation with counties and other affected stakeholders, may seek federal approval for a demonstration project under Section 1315(a) of Title 42 of the United States Code, which may include receipt of federal financial participation for services furnished to Medi-Cal beneficiaries during short-term stays for acute care in psychiatric hospitals or residential treatment settings that qualify as institutions for mental diseases. The department may elect to seek approval for this demonstration project to operate on a statewide basis or on a county-by-county basis.

(2) Notwithstanding any other law, to the extent that the department receives the necessary federal approvals to implement the demonstration project described in paragraph (1), and subject to approval by the Department of Finance, the department shall implement the demonstration in accordance with the terms of
 the federal approval and only to the extent that federal financial participation is available and is not otherwise jeopardized.

(3) For purposes of this subdivision, “institution for mental diseases” has the same meaning as set forth in Section 1396d(i) of Title 42 of the United States Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 47, Sec. 128.   (SB 184)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

14184.401.

(a) Commencing January 1, 2022, subject to subdivision (f) of Section 14184.102, the department shall continue to implement the Drug Medi-Cal organized delivery system (DMC-ODS) program, previously authorized under the California Medi-Cal 2020 Demonstration pursuant to Article 5.5 (commencing with Section 14184), as a component of CalAIM and in accordance with this article and the CalAIM Terms and Conditions.

(b) A county, or consortium of counties in a regional model, that elects to administer, or elects to continue to administer, a DMC-ODS pilot shall enter into and maintain an intergovernmental agreement with the department. Those counties shall comply with all
 applicable CalAIM Terms and Conditions and any guidance issued by the department pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 14184.102 as a condition of participation.

(c) An election by a county, or consortium of counties in a regional model, to participate as a DMC-ODS pilot shall be considered voluntary for purposes of all state and federal laws.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 143, Sec. 402.   (AB 133)   Effective July 27, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

14184.402.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, including, but not limited to, the applicable provisions of Chapter 11 (commencing with Section 1810.100) of Division 1 of Title 9, and Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 51000) of Subdivision 1 of Division 3 of Title 22, of the California Code of Regulations, commencing no sooner than January 1, 2022, all medically necessary determinations for covered specialty mental health services and substance use disorder services provided by a Medi-Cal behavioral health delivery system shall be made in accordance with Section 14059.5, except as provided in this section and any written instructions issued by the department pursuant to subdivision (j) until such time that regulations are promulgated
 or amended.

(b) (1) Subject to subdivision (f) of Section 14184.102, the following nonspecialty mental health services shall be covered by a Medi-Cal managed care plan, or available through the Medi-Cal fee-for-service delivery system for beneficiaries not enrolled in a Medi-Cal managed care plan or for services that are carved out from a Medi-Cal managed care plan’s comprehensive risk contract:

(A) Individual and group mental health evaluation and treatment, including psychotherapy, family therapy, and dyadic services.

(B) Psychological testing, when clinically indicated to evaluate a mental health condition.

(C) Outpatient
 services for the purposes of monitoring drug therapy.

(D) Psychiatric consultation.

(E) Outpatient laboratory, drugs, supplies, and supplements.

(2) Covered nonspecialty mental health services for adult beneficiaries with mild-to-moderate distress or mild-to-moderate impairment of mental, emotional, or behavioral functioning resulting from mental health disorders, as defined by the current edition of the Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of Mental Disorders, shall be provided by a Medi-Cal managed care plan or through the Medi-Cal fee-for-service delivery system. A Medi-Cal managed care plan shall provide medically necessary nonspecialty mental health services to enrolled beneficiaries under 21 years of age as required
 pursuant to Section 1396d(r) of Title 42 of the United States Code. A Medi-Cal managed care plan shall also be responsible for providing covered nonspecialty mental health services to enrolled beneficiaries with potential mental health disorders not yet diagnosed.

(c) For enrolled beneficiaries 21 years of age or older, a county mental health plan shall provide covered specialty mental health services for beneficiaries who meet both of the following criteria:

(1) The beneficiary has one or both of the following:

(A) Significant impairment, where impairment is defined as distress, disability, or dysfunction in social, occupational, or other important activities.

(B) A reasonable probability of significant deterioration in an important area of life functioning.

(2) The beneficiary’s condition as described in paragraph (1) is due to either of the following:

(A) A diagnosed mental health disorder, according to the criteria of the current editions of the Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of Mental Disorders and the International Statistical Classification of Diseases and Related Health Problems.

(B) A suspected mental disorder that has not yet been diagnosed.

(d) For enrolled beneficiaries under 21 years of age, a county mental health plan shall provide all medically necessary specialty mental health services
 required pursuant to Section 1396d(r) of Title 42 of the United States Code. Covered specialty mental health services shall be provided to enrolled beneficiaries who meet either of the following criteria:

(1) The beneficiary has a condition placing them at high risk for a mental health disorder due to experiencing trauma evidenced by scoring in the high-risk range under a trauma screening tool approved by the department, involvement in the child welfare system, juvenile justice involvement, or experiencing homelessness.

(2) The beneficiary meets both of the following requirements:

(A) The beneficiary has at least one of the following:

(i) A significant
 impairment.

(ii) A reasonable probability of significant deterioration in an important area of life functioning.

(iii) A reasonable probability of not progressing developmentally as appropriate.

(iv) A need for specialty mental health services, regardless of presence of impairment, that are not included within the mental health benefits that a Medi-Cal managed care plan is required to provide.

(B) The beneficiary’s condition as described in subparagraph (A) is due to one of the following:

(i) A diagnosed mental health disorder, according to the criteria of the current editions of the Diagnostic
 and Statistical Manual of Mental Disorders and the International Statistical Classification of Diseases and Related Health Problems.

(ii) A suspected mental health disorder that has not yet been diagnosed.

(iii) Significant trauma placing the beneficiary at risk of a future mental health condition, based on the assessment of a licensed mental health professional.

(e) (1) Covered services provided under a county Drug Medi-Cal Treatment Program or a Drug Medi-Cal organized delivery system shall use criteria adopted by the American Society of Addiction Medicine to determine the appropriate level of care for substance use disorder treatment services.

(2) Covered services provided under a county Drug Medi-Cal Treatment Program or a Drug Medi-Cal organized delivery system shall include all medically necessary substance use disorder services for an individual under 21 years of age as required pursuant to Section 1396d(r) of Title 42 of the United States Code.

(3) A full assessment utilizing the criteria adopted by the American Society of Addiction Medicine shall not be required for a beneficiary to begin receiving services through a Drug Medi-Cal Treatment Program or a Drug Medi-Cal organized delivery system.

(f) (1) This section and Section 14059.5 shall not be construed to exclude coverage for, or reimbursement of, a clinically appropriate and covered mental health or substance use disorder prevention,
 screening, assessment, treatment, or recovery service under any of the following circumstances:

(A) Services were provided prior to determining a diagnosis.

(B) The prevention, screening, assessment, treatment, or recovery service was not included in an individual treatment plan.

(C) The treated Medi-Cal beneficiary has a co-occurring mental health condition and substance use disorder.

(D) For a provider who provides specialty mental health services to a Medi-Cal beneficiary under a contract between the department and a county mental health plan when that beneficiary concurrently receives nonspecialty mental health services from a Medi-Cal managed care plan or under
 the Medi-Cal fee-for-service delivery system, if those services are coordinated between the specialty and nonspecialty delivery systems and those services are not duplicative.

(E) For a provider who provides nonspecialty mental health services to a Medi-Cal beneficiary pursuant to a comprehensive risk contract with a Medi-Cal managed care plan or under the Medi-Cal fee-for-service delivery system when that beneficiary concurrently receives specialty mental health services from a county mental health plan, if those services are coordinated between the nonspecialty and specialty delivery systems and those services are not duplicative.

(2) This section and Section 14059.5 shall not be construed to exclude clinically appropriate and covered mental health or substance use
 disorder services during the assessment process.

(g) A dispute between a county mental health plan and a Medi-Cal managed care plan shall not delay the provision of medically necessary services by the county mental health plan or the Medi-Cal managed care plan.

(h) (1) The department shall develop, in consultation with county behavioral health directors, consumer advocates, labor organizations representing county behavioral health workers, mental health and substance use disorder treatment providers, and Medi-Cal managed care plans, standardized screening tools to guide a referral to a Medi-Cal behavioral health delivery system. The department shall develop a standardized screening tool for Medi-Cal beneficiaries who are under 21 years of age and a separate
 standardized screening tool for those who are 21 years of age or older. The department may require the use of these standardized screening tools by Medi-Cal behavioral health delivery systems and Medi-Cal managed care plans.

(2) The department shall develop, in consultation with county behavioral health directors, consumer advocates, labor organizations representing county behavioral health workers, mental health and substance use disorder treatment providers, and Medi-Cal managed care plans, standardized statewide transition tools to ensure that Medi-Cal beneficiaries requiring transition between delivery systems receive timely coordinated care. The department shall develop a standardized statewide transition tool for Medi-Cal beneficiaries who are under 21 years of age and a separate standardized statewide transition tool for those who are 21
 years of age or older. The department may require the use of these standardized statewide transition tools.

(3) The department shall develop, in consultation with county behavioral health directors, consumer advocates, labor organizations representing county behavioral health workers, and mental health and substance use disorders treatment providers, documentation standards and changes to the department’s clinical auditing standards. The department may require the use of these documentation standards by Medi-Cal behavioral health delivery systems, including, but not limited to, restrictions developed in consultation with representatives of Medi-Cal behavioral health delivery systems on what Medi-Cal behavioral health delivery systems impose on their contract providers, consistent with Medi-Cal managed care plans and taking into account the
 need to ensure quality and program integrity and to address equity and disparities.

(i) (1) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department, without taking any further regulatory action, shall implement, interpret, and make specific this section and the associated CalAIM terms and conditions by means of all-county letters, plan letters, information notices, or similar instructions, until regulations are promulgated or amended in accordance with paragraph (2).

(2) Notwithstanding subdivision (d) of Section 14184.102, the department shall promulgate or amend regulations, as necessary, to implement, interpret, and make specific this section and the associated CalAIM
 terms and conditions in accordance with the requirements of Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code by July 1, 2024.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 143, Sec. 402.   (AB 133)   Effective July 27, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

14184.403.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, commencing no sooner than July 1, 2022, subject to subdivision (f) of Section 14184.102, each Medi-Cal behavioral health delivery system shall comply with the behavioral health payment reform provisions approved in the CalAIM Terms and Conditions and any associated instruction issued by the department pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 14184.102.

(b) As a component of Behavioral Health Payment Reform under CalAIM, the department shall, at a minimum, design and implement an intergovernmental transfer-based reimbursement methodology to replace the use of certified public expenditures for claims associated with covered Specialty Mental Health and Drug Medi-Cal services provided through Medi-Cal behavioral health delivery
 systems.

(c) Notwithstanding any other law, commencing no sooner than July 1, 2022, the nonfederal share of any payments associated with each Medi-Cal behavioral health delivery system shall consist of voluntary intergovernmental transfers of funds provided by eligible governmental agencies or public entities associated with a respective Medi-Cal behavioral health delivery system. Upon providing any intergovernmental transfer of funds, each transferring entity shall certify that the transferred funds qualify for federal financial participation pursuant to Section 433.51 of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations, any other applicable federal Medicaid laws, and the CalAIM Terms and Conditions, and in the form and manner specified by the department. Any intergovernmental transfer of funds made pursuant to this section shall be considered voluntary for purposes of all state and federal laws. Notwithstanding any other law, the department shall
 not assess the fee described in subdivision (d) of Section 14301.4 or any other similar fee on the intergovernmental transfers made pursuant to this section. The total intergovernmental transfer-funded payment amount, which includes the federal and nonfederal share, paid to a Medi-Cal behavioral health delivery system shall be for the support of behavioral health-related services and activities that benefit patients served by the Medi-Cal behavioral health delivery system, consistent with federal law.

(d) (1) The department shall establish and implement prospective reimbursement rate methodologies utilizing past county cost experience for covered Specialty Mental Health and Drug Medi-Cal services provided by Medi-Cal behavioral health delivery systems. Those methodologies shall make use of peer groups whereby counties are grouped according to past cost experience, where the department determines appropriate. The department
 shall determine the frequency of payments and intergovernmental transfers made pursuant to this section. The department shall consult with the representatives of Medi-Cal behavioral health delivery systems in the development of the rate methodologies, peer groups, and the payment schedule.

(2) The department, in consultation with the representatives of Medi-Cal behavioral health delivery systems, shall review and may modify the methodologies annually, including, but not limited to, adjustments to the peer groups or to rates.

(e) (1) The Medi-Cal County Behavioral Health Fund is hereby created in the State Treasury.

(2) The nonfederal moneys collected by the department pursuant to this section shall be deposited in
 the Medi-Cal County Behavioral Health Fund.

(3) Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, the moneys deposited in the Medi-Cal County Behavioral Health Fund are continuously appropriated, without regard to fiscal year, to the department for purposes of implementing this section.

(4) (A) Notwithstanding any other law, for counties that elect to participate in the offset and transfer of funds pursuant to this paragraph, moneys from the following sources shall be offset and transferred by the Controller into the Medi-Cal County Behavioral Health Fund pursuant to schedules, in accordance with subparagraph (C), provided by the department and created in consultation with the Department of Finance and applicable counties:

(i) The Behavioral Health Subaccount in the Support Services Account
 in the Local Revenue Fund 2011 established pursuant to subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 30025 of the Government Code.

(ii) The Mental Health Subaccount in the Sales Tax Account in the Local Revenue Fund established pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 17600.

(iii) The Mental Health Services Fund established pursuant to Section 5890.

(B) To the extent that funds are offset and transferred from the subaccounts or fund listed in subparagraph (A), the use of the funds shall be consistent with, and in furtherance of, the purposes for which they were previously deposited to the subaccounts or fund, as applicable.

(C) (i) If the department prepares monthly schedules, it shall provide the
 schedules to the Controller by the first day of each month. If the department prepares quarterly schedules, it shall provide the schedules to the Controller detailing offsets for each month in that quarter by the first day of each quarter as agreed upon by the department, the Department of Finance, and the Controller.

(ii) The department shall provide notifications to the Controller to start, stop, or resume offsetting funds by the first day of the month for changes expected to take effect in the current month. Notifications received by the Controller after the first day of the month shall be processed in the subsequent month.

(5) Notwithstanding Section 16305.7 of the Government Code, the Medi-Cal County Behavioral Health Fund shall contain all interest and dividends earned on moneys in the fund and shall be used only for the purpose of implementing this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 42, Sec. 159.   (AB 118)   Effective July 10, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

14184.404.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, commencing January 1, 2027, subject to subdivision (f) of Section 14184.102, an individual county, or counties acting jointly, shall provide and administer covered behavioral health Medi-Cal benefits under a single Medi-Cal behavioral health delivery system contract and, if participating in the Drug Medi-Cal organized delivery system (DMC-ODS), shall deliver those benefits through a single Prepaid Inpatient Health Plan (PIHP), in accordance with the CalAIM Terms and Conditions.

(b) During the CalAIM term, the department, in
 consultation with counties, shall conduct any planning activities
 that it deems necessary and issue related guidance pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 14184.102 to facilitate implementation of subdivision (a).

(c) The department may authorize a noncounty organization that it contracts with pursuant to Section 14712 or Section 14124.21 to provide and administer covered behavioral health Medi-Cal benefits under a single Medi-Cal behavioral health delivery system contract, in accordance with the CalAIM Terms and Conditions.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 27, Sec. 91.   (SB 164)   Effective June 29, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

14184.405.

(a) Subject to appropriation, the department shall establish, implement, and administer the Behavioral Health Quality Improvement Program to provide grants to qualified Medi-Cal behavioral health delivery systems for purposes of preparing those entities and their contracting health care providers for implementation of CalAIM behavioral health components described in this article and for other purposes related to Medi-Cal behavioral health delivery systems as specified in an annual Budget Act or enacted legislation providing appropriations related to those acts.

(b) The department shall, in consultation with representatives of the Medi-Cal behavioral health delivery systems, determine the eligibility criteria, grant application process, and methodology for
 distribution of the moneys appropriated to the department for the purposes described in this section to Medi-Cal behavioral health delivery systems that the department deems qualified.

(c) This section shall be implemented only if, and to the extent that, the department determines that federal financial participation is not jeopardized.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 47, Sec. 129.   (SB 184)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

14184.500.

(a) The department shall implement the State Plan Dental Improvement Program in accordance with the CalAIM Terms and Conditions and as described in this section, with the goal of further improving accessibility of Medi-Cal dental services and oral health outcomes for statewide and targeted populations, as a successor program to the Dental Transformation Initiative described in Section 14184.70.

(b) Commencing no sooner than January 1, 2022, subject to subdivision (f) of Section 14184.102, both of the following shall be covered Medi-Cal benefits for the specified populations, when medically necessary and subject to utilization controls:

(1) Caries Risk Assessment bundle for eligible children 0 to 6 years of age, inclusive.

(2) Silver diamine fluoride for eligible children 0 to 6 years of age, inclusive, and for eligible beneficiaries residing in skilled nursing facilities or intermediate care facilities or that receive services in facilities overseen by the State Department of Developmental Services, as determined by the department.

(c) (1)   Commencing no sooner than January 1, 2022, subject to subdivision (f) of Section 14184.102, the department shall make supplemental payments to qualified dental providers for increased utilization of certain preventive dental services, and for the establishment
 or maintenance of beneficiary continuity of care through a dental home.

(2) The department shall develop the methodology for making supplemental payments pursuant to this subdivision, including, but not limited to, the eligibility criteria for receiving payments, the amount of payments, and the applicable preventive dental services that are eligible for payments.

(A) For payments for increased utilization of certain preventive services, the department shall make a supplemental payment to a qualified dental service office location for each eligible paid claim made for those Current Dental Terminology codes specified by the department and approved in the CalAIM Terms and Conditions. To the extent the department deems practicable, the
 supplemental payment shall be applied at the same time as the underlying eligible paid claim is made.

(B) For payments for the establishment or maintenance of beneficiary continuity of care through a dental home, the department shall make a supplemental payment to each eligible service office location statewide based on the number of Medi-Cal beneficiaries for which eligible paid claims were submitted using at least one of Current Dental Terminology exam codes, as specified by the department, in two or more consecutive calendar years.

(d) To the extent permissible under federal law and authorized under the CalAIM Terms and Conditions, for purposes of eligibility for payments described in this section, qualified dental